Maryland, session 2026, HB1435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HORMONE–RELATED CARE” MEANS MEDICALLY NECESSARY
TREATMENT INVOLVING THE PRESCRIPTION, ADMINISTRATION, MONITORING, OR
ADJUSTMENT OF HORMONE THERAPIES FOR ENDOCRINE, REPRODUCTIVE,
METABOLIC, PERIMENOPAUSAL, MENOPAUSAL, OR OTHER CONDITIONS.
(3) “MEDICALLY NECESSARY” MEANS CARE THAT IS:
(I) CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF
MEDICAL PRACTICE;
(II) CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE FOR THE PATIENT’S CONDITION;
AND
(III) NOT PRIMARILY FOR THE CONVENIENCE OF THE PATIENT
OR PROVIDER.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1435 3
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
HORMONE–RELATED CARE, INCLUDING:
(1) HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY;
(2) HORMONE SUPPRESSION OR MODULATION THERAPY;
(3) HORMONE–MODULATING MEDICATIONS;
(4) LABORATORY TESTING, DIAGNOSTIC EVALUATIONS, AND
ONGOING MONITORING RELATED TO HORMONE THERAPY; AND
(5) CLINICAL VISITS FOR THE INITIATION AND CONTINUATION OF
HORMONE THERAPY OR OTHER HORMONE–RELATED CARE.
(D) COVERAGE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE DENIED BASED ON:
(1) THE SPECIFIC DIAGNOSIS FOR WHICH THE HORMONE–RELATED
CARE IS PRESCRIBED, INCLUDING MENOPAUSAL AND PERIMENOPAUSAL
SYMPTOMS;
(2) THE PATIENT’S AGE; OR
(3) PRIOR USE OR NONUSE OF HORMONE–RELATED CARE.
(E) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT:
(1) IMPOSE EXCLUSIONS OR LIMITATIONS ON HORMONE–RELATED
CARE THAT ARE MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN THOSE APPLIED TO COMPARABLE
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS OR MEDICAL SERVICES;
(2) REQUIRE PRIOR AUTHORIZATION, STEP THERAPY, OR REPEATED
MEDICAL NECESSITY REVIEWS THAT ARE MORE BURDENSOME THAN THOSE
APPLIED TO COMPARABLE TREATMENTS;
(3) DENY COVERAGE SOLELY BECAUSE THE HORMONE–RELATED
CARE IS NEEDED AS AN ONGOING, LONG–TERM TREATMENT; OR

HOUSE BILL 1435
(4) APPLY HIGHER COST–SHARING, COPAYMENTS, OR DEDUCTIBLES
FOR HORMONE–RELATED CARE THAN COMPARABLE TREATMENTS.
(F) (1) A DETERMINATION OF MEDICAL NECESSITY FOR
HORMONE–RELATED CARE SHALL BE BASED ON:
(I) EVIDENCE–BASED CLINICAL GUIDELINES;
(II) THE PROFESSIONAL JUDGMENT OF THE TREATING
PROVIDER; AND
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL NEEDS OF THE PATIENT.
(2) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT SUBSTITUTE ITS
OWN CLINICAL JUDGMENT FOR THAT OF THE TREATING PROVIDER IF THE
PROVIDER’S DETERMINATION IS CONSISTENT WITH ACCEPTED MEDICAL
STANDARDS.
(G) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE THAT COVERED
INDIVIDUALS HAVE TIMELY ACCESS TO HORMONE–RELATED CARE, INCLUDING:
(1) ACCESS TO IN–NETWORK PROVIDERS WITH APPROPRIATE
EXPERTISE IN ENDOCRINE, REPRODUCTIVE, PERIMENOPAUSAL, AND MENOPAUSAL
CARE; AND
(2) COVERAGE FOR OUT–OF–NETWORK PROVIDERS IF IN–NETWORK
ACCESS IS UNAVAILABLE WITHIN A REASONABLE TRAVEL AREA.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, EACH
ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL REPORT TO THE ADMINISTRATION ON:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF CLAIMS SUBMITTED FOR
HORMONE–RELATED CARE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR, INCLUDING
CARE RELATED TO PERIMENOPAUSE AND MENOPAUSE;
(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF CLAIMS DENIED AND THE REASONS
FOR DENYING THE CLAIMS; AND
(III) THE AVERAGE AUTHORIZATION AND PROCESSING TIMES.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE

HOUSE BILL 1435 5
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A REPORT SUMMARIZING
THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.